Oklahoma, session 2026, SB218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-205.3 of Title 47, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any person:


1. Who has been convicted of an offense other than an offense


requiring mandatory revocation of the individual’s driver license,


pursuant to the provisions of Section 6-205 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes; and



Req. No. 1020 Page 1


2. Who held a valid, unexpired Oklahoma driver license upon


imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections which


expired during the person’s term of imprisonment or within six (6)


months after the person is discharged from incarceration,


shall have the expiration date of his or her driver license extended


for a period of six (6) months after he or she is released from the


custody of the Department of Corrections. This subsection shall not


be construed to confer driving privileges to an individual in any


jurisdiction other than this state.


B. Prior to the expiration of the six-month period, the person


shall be eligible to enter into an agreement with Service Oklahoma


for issuance of a provisional license as provided for in subsection


D of Section 6-212 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes; provided,


the Department of Corrections shall provide the person with relevant


documentation to assist in obtaining a provisional license before


being released from custody. The person shall pay a minimum of


Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) per month toward the satisfaction of


outstanding fees and fines including, but not limited to,


provisional license fees, warrant fees, court costs or fees, or


driver license or commercial driver license reinstatement fees.


Service Oklahoma may suspend or revoke a provisional license if the


person fails to honor the payment plan.





Req. No. 1020 Page 2


C. Service Oklahoma and the Department of Corrections are


authorized to promulgate rules and procedures to implement the


provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 513.3, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 64, O.S.L. 2022 (57 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 513.3), is amended to read as follows:


Section 513.3. A. When any inmate shall be discharged from an


institution of the Department of Corrections and the intended


residence designated by the inmate is within this state, the


Department of Corrections shall provide the inmate with relevant


documentation to assist the inmate in obtaining post-release


employment and shall coordinate with the Department of Public Safety


Service Oklahoma to provide a REAL ID Noncompliant Identification


Card if the inmate does not have a current state-issued


identification card or driver license.


B. 1. Within nine (9) months prior to the release of an inmate


from custody, the Department of Corrections shall identify whether


the inmate has a current form of state identification and begin the


process of gathering the documentation required for the issuance of


a REAL ID Noncompliant Identification Card pursuant to Section 6-


105.3 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes. If an inmate has any


valid form of a state-issued identification card or driver license,


the inmate may avail himself or herself of the provisions of this


section.

Req. No. 1020 Page 3


2. The Department of Corrections may utilize any funds


available to cover the costs associated with the implementation and


administration of this section and the purchase of REAL ID


Noncompliant Identification Cards, including, but not limited to,


inmate trust funds, existing funds of the Department of Corrections,


and donations.


3. The provisions of this section shall apply only to inmates


who may receive a state-issued identification card pursuant to


Section 1550.42 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


C. For purposes of assisting an inmate in obtaining post-


release employment, the Department of Corrections shall provide the


inmate with the following documentation:


1. A copy of the vocational training record of the inmate, if


applicable;


2. A copy of the work record of the inmate, if applicable;


3. A certified copy of the birth certificate of the inmate, if


obtainable;


4. A Social Security card or a replacement Social Security card


of the inmate, if obtainable;


5. A resume that includes any trade learned by the inmate and


the proficiency at that trade by the inmate; and


6. Documentation that the inmate has completed a practice job


interview.



Req. No. 1020 Page 4


In addition, the Department shall notify the inmate if he or she


is eligible to apply for a license from a state entity charged with


oversight of an occupational license or certification.


D. The following categories of inmates are not required to


complete resumes or practice job interviews prior to their release


from incarceration:


1. Inmates sixty-five (65) years of age or older;


2. Inmates releasing to medical parole or discharging from a


prison infirmary setting;


3. Inmates releasing from a Department of Corrections Mental


Health Unit;


4. Inmates releasing to the custody of another jurisdiction on


a warrant or detainer;


5. Inmates returning to community supervision from an


intermediate revocation facility; and


6. Inmates that the Department determines would be physically


or mentally unable to return to the workforce upon release from


incarceration.


E. The Department of Corrections is authorized to promulgate


rules and procedures to implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby



Req. No. 1020 Page 5


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1020 CN 12/30/2024 4:48:23 PM









































Req. No. 1020 Page 6